Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.280

Conflict resolution program.

The superintendent of public instruction and the office of the attorney general, in cooperation with the Washington state bar association and statewide dispute resolution organizations, shall develop a volunteer-based conflict resolution and mediation program for use in community groups such as neighborhood organizations and the public schools. The program shall use lawyers or certified mediators to train students who in turn become trainers and mediators for their peers in conflict resolution.

[ 2015 c 126 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 611.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.